Washington statutes.
RCW 19.86.145

Penalties—Animals used in biomedical research.

Any violation of RCW 9.08.070 through 9.08.078 or 16.52.220 constitutes an unfair or deceptive practice in violation of this chapter. The relief available under this chapter for violations of RCW 9.08.070 through 9.08.078 or 16.52.220 by a research institution shall be limited to only monetary penalties in an amount not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars.

[ 2003 c 53 s 150; 1989 c 359 s 4.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.